North Carolina statutes. Chapter 30. Surviving Spouses.
Article 2. Dower. [Repealed]

§§ 30-4 through 30-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1959, c. 879, s. 14.

Cross References.

As to abolition of the estate of dower, see

G.S. 29-4

.

§ 30-9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 853.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to conveyance without joinder of incompetent spouse, see

G.S. 39-7

.

§ 30-10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1959, c. 879, s. 14.